District of Columbia statutes.
4-204.51

Short title.

This part may be cited as the “Medicaid and Special Education Reform Fund Establishment Act of 2002”.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1551, 49 DCR 6968
Section 1506 of D.C. Law 14-190 provided that this part shall apply as of October 1, 2002.